Nebraska, session 109, LB1151.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-101 Sections 53-101 to 53-1,122 and sections 3 to 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.
Sec. 2. Section 53-103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-103 For purposes of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, the
definitions found in sections 53-103.01 to 53-103.52 and section 3 of
this act apply.
Sec. 3. Regional craft brewery means a craft brewery that produces
between twenty thousand and two hundred thousand barrels of beer a year.
Sec. 4. (1) Any person who operates a regional craft brewery shall
obtain a license pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act. A license
to operate a regional craft brewery shall permit the production of
aggregate from all physical locations comprising the licensed premises. A
regional craft brewery may also sell to beer wholesalers for sale and
distribution to licensed retailers. A regional craft brewery license
issued pursuant to this section shall be the only license required by the
Nebraska Liquor Control Act for the manufacture and retail sale of beer
for consumption on or off the licensed premises, except that the sale of
any beer other than beer manufactured by the regional craft brewery
licensee, wine, or alcoholic liquor by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises shall require the appropriate retail license. The
holder of a regional craft brewery license shall have the right to obtain
a retail license at such licensed premises or at any microbrewery or
brewpub operated by such regional craft brewery. Any license held by the
operator of a craft brewery shall be subject to the act.
(2) A holder of a regional craft brewery license may obtain an
annual catering license pursuant to section 53-124.12, a special
designated license pursuant to section 53-124.11, an entertainment
district license pursuant to section 53-123.17, or a promotional farmers
-2-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
market special designated license pursuant to section 53-124.16.
(3) For purposes of this section, licensed premises may include up
to eight separate physical locations.
(4) A holder of a regional craft brewery license may store and
warehouse tax-paid products produced on such licensee's licensed premises
in a designated, secure, offsite storage facility if the holder of the
regional craft brewery license receives authorization from the commission
and notifies the commission of the location of the storage facility and
maintains, at the regional craft brewery and at the storage facility, a
separate perpetual inventory of the product stored at the storage
facility. Consumption of alcoholic liquor at the storage facility is
strictly prohibited.
(5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
pertaining to the licensure and rights of regional craft breweries.
Sec. 5. Section 53-103.51, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-103.51 (1) Primary source of supply in the United States means:
(a) The manufacturer, producer, or owner of any alcoholic liquor at
the time it becomes a marketable product in the United States;
(b) The bottler of any alcoholic liquor in the United States;
(c) The exclusive agent within the United States or any of the
states of any manufacturer, producer, owner, or bottler of any alcoholic
liquor outside the United States; or
(d) A licensed Nebraska craft brewery, regional craft brewery, farm
winery, microdistillery, or manufacturer.
(2) To be the primary source of supply in the United States, the
licensee causing such alcoholic liquor to be imported into Nebraska must
be the first source, such as the manufacturer or the source closest to
the manufacturer, in the channel of commerce from which the product can
be secured by Nebraska licensed wholesalers.
Sec. 6. Section 53-116.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-3-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
amended to read:
53-116.02 Whenever any retail licensee, bottle club licensee, craft
brewery licensee, regional craft brewery licensee, or microdistillery
licensee has been convicted by any court of a violation of the Nebraska
Liquor Control Act, the licensee may, in addition to the penalties for
such offense, incur a forfeiture of the license and all money that had
been paid for the license. The local governing body may conditionally
revoke the license subject to a final order of the commission, or the
commission may revoke the license in an original proceeding brought
before it for that purpose.
Sec. 7. Section 53-117.07, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-117.07 All proceedings for the suspension, cancellation, or
revocation of licenses of manufacturers, wholesalers, nonbeverage users,
craft breweries, regional craft breweries, microdistilleries, railroads,
airlines, shippers, boats, special party buses, and pedal-pub vehicles
shall be before the commission, and the proceedings shall be in
accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by it not
inconsistent with law. No such license shall be so suspended, canceled,
or revoked except after a hearing by the commission with reasonable
notice to the licensee and opportunity to appear and defend.
Sec. 8. Section 53-123, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-123 Licenses issued by the commission shall be of the following
types: (1) Manufacturer's license; (2) alcoholic liquor wholesale
license, except beer; (3) beer wholesale license; (4) retail license; (5)
railroad license; (6) airline license; (7) boat license; (8) nonbeverage
user's license; (9) farm winery license; (10) craft brewery license; (11)
shipping license; (12) special designated license; (13) catering license;
(14) microdistillery license; (15) entertainment district license; (16)
pedal-pub vehicle license; (17) bottle club license; (18) special party
-4-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
bus license; and (19) promotional farmers market special designated
license; and (20) regional craft brewery license.
Sec. 9. Section 53-123.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-123.01 (1) A manufacturer's license shall allow the manufacture,
storage, and sale of alcoholic liquor to wholesale licensees in this
state and to such persons outside the state as may be permitted by law,
except that nothing in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall prohibit a
manufacturer of beer from distributing tax-paid samples of beer at the
premises of a licensed manufacturer for consumption on the premises. A
manufacturer's license issued pursuant to this section shall be the only
license required by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act for the manufacture
and retail sale of beer manufactured on the licensed premises for
consumption on the licensed premises.
(2)(a) A licensee who or which first obtains a craft brewery license
pursuant to section 53-123.14, holds such license for not less than three
years, and operates a brewpub or microbrewery on the licensed premises of
such craft brewery license shall obtain, a manufacturer's license when
the manufacture of beer on the licensed premises exceeds twenty thousand
barrels per year, either (i) a regional craft brewery license pursuant to
section 4 of this act or (ii) a manufacturer's license. The
manufacturer's license shall authorize the continued retail sale of beer
for consumption on or off the premises but only to the extent the
premises were previously licensed as a craft brewery. The sale of any
beer other than beer manufactured by the licensee, wine, or alcoholic
liquor for consumption on the licensed premises shall require the
appropriate retail license. The holder of such manufacturer's license may
continue to operate up to eight retail locations which are in operation
at the time such manufacturer's license is issued and shall divest itself
from retail locations in excess of eight locations. The licensee shall
not begin operation at any new retail location even if the licensee's
-5-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
production is reduced below twenty thousand barrels per year.
(b) The holder of such manufacturer's license may obtain an annual
catering license pursuant to section 53-124.12, a special designated
license pursuant to section 53-124.11, or an entertainment district
license pursuant to section 53-123.17.
(3) A holder of a manufacturer's license to manufacture spirits may
operate a rickhouse that meets the requirements for a distilled spirit
plant pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 5178, as such section existed on January 1,
2024, if such manufacturer receives authorization from the commission and
notifies the commission of the location of such rickhouse in a manner
prescribed by the commission.
Sec. 10. Section 53-123.15, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-123.15 (1) No person shall order or receive alcoholic liquor in
this state which has been shipped directly to him or her from outside
this state by any person other than a holder of a shipping license issued
by the commission, except that a licensed wholesaler may receive not more
than three gallons of wine in any calendar year from any person who is
not a holder of a shipping license.
(2) The commission may issue a shipping license to a manufacturer.
Such license shall allow the licensee to ship alcoholic liquor only to a
licensed wholesaler. A person who receives a license pursuant to this
subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01
for a manufacturer's shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the
commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
General Fund, except that the fee received for a shipping license issued
to a beer manufacturer pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to
the Nebraska Beer Industry Promotional Fund.
(3) The commission may issue a shipping license to any person who
deals with vintage wines, which shipping license shall allow the licensee
to distribute such wines to a licensed wholesaler in the state. For
-6-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
purposes of distributing vintage wines, a licensed shipper must utilize a
designated wholesaler if the manufacturer has a designated wholesaler.
For purposes of this section, vintage wine shall mean a wine verified to
be ten years of age or older and not available from a primary American
source of supply. A person who receives a license pursuant to this
subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01
for a vintage wine dealer's shipping license. Such fee shall be collected
by the commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the General Fund.
(4) The commission may issue a shipping license to a wholesaler
located outside the State of Nebraska. Such license shall allow the
licensee to ship alcoholic liquor only to a licensed Nebraska wholesaler.
A person who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the
fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a wholesalers shipping
license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(5) The commission may issue a shipping license to any manufacturer
who sells and ships alcoholic liquor from another state directly to a
consumer in this state if the manufacturer satisfies the requirements of
subsections (8) through (10) of this section. A manufacturer who receives
a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in
sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a manufacture direct sales shipping
license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Winery and Grape Producers
Promotional Fund.
(6) The commission may issue a shipping license to any retailer who
is licensed within or outside Nebraska, who is authorized to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail in the state of domicile of the retailer, and
who is not a manufacturer if such retailer satisfies the requirements of
subsections (8) through (10) of this section to ship alcoholic liquor
from another state directly to a consumer in this state. A retailer who
-7-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required
in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a retail direct sales shipping
license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the Winery and Grape Producers
Promotional Fund.
(7) The application for a shipping license under subsection (2) or
(3) of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes.
The application shall contain all provisions the commission deems proper
and necessary to effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and the
rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers and
shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that the applicant, in
consideration of the issuance of such shipping license, agrees:
(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in
making and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and
keeping records;
(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section
53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents
for inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records
and to pay the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable
to such inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of
the commission if within the United States; and
(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the
application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules
and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers, the
commission may suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping license for such
period of time as it may determine.
(8) The application for a shipping license under subsection (5) or
(6) of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes.
The application shall require an applicant which is a manufacturer, a
craft brewery, a regional craft brewery, a craft distillery, or a farm
winery to identify the brands of alcoholic liquor that the applicant is
-8-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
requesting the authority to ship either into or within Nebraska. For all
applicants, unless otherwise provided in this section, the application
shall contain all provisions the commission deems proper and necessary to
effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and the rules and
regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or retailers
and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that the applicant,
in consideration of the issuance of such shipping license, agrees:
(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in
making and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and
keeping records;
(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section
53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents
for inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records
and to pay the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable
to such inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of
the commission if within the United States;
(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the
application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules
and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or
retailers, the commission may suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping
license for such period of time as it may determine;
(d) That the applicant agrees to notify the commission of any
violations in the state in which he or she is domiciled and any
violations of the direct shipping laws of any other states. Failure to
notify the commission within thirty days after such a violation may
result in a hearing before the commission pursuant to which the license
may be suspended, canceled, or revoked; and
(e) That the applicant, if a manufacturer, craft brewery, regional
craft brewery, craft distillery, or farm winery, agrees to notify any
wholesaler licensed in Nebraska that has been authorized to distribute
such brands that the application has been filed for a shipping license.
-9-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
The notice shall be in writing and in a form prescribed by the
commission. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
as it reasonably deems necessary to implement this subdivision, including
rules and regulations that permit the holder of a shipping license under
this subdivision to amend the shipping license by, among other things,
adding or deleting any brands of alcoholic liquor identified in the
shipping license.
(9) Any manufacturer or retailer who is granted a shipping license
under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall:
(a) Only ship the brands of alcoholic liquor identified on the
application;
(b) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is owned by the holder of the
shipping license;
(c) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is properly registered with the
Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau of the United States Department
of the Treasury;
(d) Not ship any alcoholic liquor products that the manufacturers or
wholesalers licensed in Nebraska have voluntarily agreed not to bring
into Nebraska at the request of the commission;
(e) Not ship more than nine liters of alcoholic liquor per month to
any person in Nebraska to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold.
All such sales and shipments shall be for personal consumption only and
not for resale; and
(f) Cause the direct shipment of alcoholic liquor to be by approved
common carrier only. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations pursuant to which common carriers may apply for approval to
provide common carriage of alcoholic liquor shipped by a holder of a
shipping license issued pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this
section. The rules and regulations shall include provisions that require
(i) the recipient to demonstrate, upon delivery, that he or she is at
least twenty-one years of age, (ii) the recipient to sign an electronic
-10-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
or paper form or other acknowledgment of receipt as approved by the
commission, and (iii) the commission-approved common carrier to submit to
the commission such information as the commission may prescribe. The
commission-approved common carrier shall refuse delivery when the
proposed recipient appears to be under the age of twenty-one years and
refuses to present valid identification. All holders of shipping licenses
shipping alcoholic liquor pursuant to this subdivision shall affix a
conspicuous notice in sixteen-point type or larger to the outside of each
package of alcoholic liquor shipped within or into the State of Nebraska,
in a conspicuous location, stating: CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES;
SIGNATURE OF PERSON AT LEAST 21 YEARS OF AGE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY. Any
delivery of alcoholic beverages to a minor by a common carrier shall
constitute a violation by the common carrier. The common carrier and the
holder of the shipping license shall be liable only for their independent
acts.
(10) For purposes of sections 53-160, 77-2703, and 77-27,142, each
shipment of alcoholic liquor by the holder of a shipping license under
subsection (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall constitute a sale in
Nebraska by establishing a nexus in the state. The holder of the shipping
license shall collect all the taxes due to the State of Nebraska and any
political subdivision and remit any excise taxes monthly to the
commission and any sales taxes to the Department of Revenue.
(11) By July 1, 2014, the commission shall report to the General
Affairs Committee of the Legislature the number of shipping licenses
issued for license years 2013-14 and 2014-15. The report shall be made
electronically.
Sec. 11. Section 53-123.17, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-123.17 (1) A local governing body may designate an entertainment
district in which a commons area may be used by retail, craft brewery,
regional craft brewery, and microdistillery licensees and holders of a
-11-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
manufacturer's license which obtain an entertainment district license.
The local governing body may, at any time, revoke such designation if it
finds that the commons area threatens the health, safety, or welfare of
the public or has become a common nuisance. The local governing body
shall file the designation or the revocation of the designation with the
commission.
(2) An entertainment district license allows the sale of alcoholic
liquor for consumption on the premises within the confines of a commons
area. The consumption of alcoholic liquor in the commons area shall only
occur during the hours authorized for sale of alcoholic liquor for
consumption on the premises under section 53-179 and while food service
is available in the commons area or is available for sale by at least one
holder of an entertainment district license. Only the holder of an
entertainment district license or employees of such licensee may sell or
dispense alcoholic liquor in the commons area.
(3) An entertainment district licensee shall serve alcoholic liquor
to be consumed in the commons area in containers that prominently display
the licensee's trade name or logo or some other mark that is unique to
the licensee under the licensee's retail license, craft brewery license,
regional craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license. An entertainment district licensee may allow
alcohol sold by another entertainment district licensee to enter the
licensed premises of either licensee. No entertainment district licensee
shall allow alcoholic liquor to leave the commons area or the premises
licensed under its retail license, craft brewery license, regional craft
brewery license, microdistillery license, or manufacturer's license.
(4) If the licensed premises of the holder of a license to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
a craft brewery license, regional craft brewery license, a
microdistillery license, or a manufacturer's license is adjacent to a
commons area in an entertainment district designated by a local governing
-12-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
body pursuant to this section, the holder of the license may obtain an
annual entertainment district license as prescribed in this section. The
entertainment district license shall be issued for the same period and
may be renewed in the same manner as the retail license, craft brewery
license, regional craft brewery license, microdistillery license, or
manufacturer's license.
(5) In order to obtain an entertainment district license, a person
eligible under subsection (4) of this section shall:
(a) File an application with the commission upon such forms as the
commission prescribes; and
(b) Pay an additional license fee of three hundred dollars for the
privilege of serving alcohol in the entertainment district payable to the
clerk of the local governing body in the same manner as license fees
under subdivision (4) of section 53-134.
(6) When an application for an entertainment district license is
filed, the commission shall notify the clerk of the local governing body.
The commission shall include with such notice one copy of the application
by mail or electronic delivery. The local governing body and the
commission shall process the application in the same manner as provided
in section 53-132.
(7) The local governing body may impose an occupation tax on the
business of an entertainment district licensee doing business within the
liquor license jurisdiction of the local governing body as provided in
subdivision (11)(b) of this section in accordance with section 53-132.
(8) The local governing body with respect to entertainment district
licensees within its liquor license jurisdiction as provided in
subdivision (11)(b) of this section may cancel an entertainment district
license for cause for the remainder of the period for which such
entertainment district license is issued. Any person whose entertainment
district license is canceled may appeal to the commission in accordance
with section 53-134.
-13-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
(9) A local governing body may regulate by ordinance, not
inconsistent with the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, any area it designates
as an entertainment district.
(10) Violation of any provision of this section or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section by an
entertainment district licensee may be cause to revoke, cancel, or
suspend the retail license issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124,
craft brewery license, regional craft brewery license, microdistillery
license, or manufacturer's license held by such licensee.
(11) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) Commons area means an area:
(A) Within an entertainment district designated by a local governing
body;
(B) Shared by authorized licensees with entertainment district
licenses;
(C) Abutting the licensed premises of such licensees;
(D) With reasonable safety measures in place to protect pedestrians,
including signage, lighting, and reduced motor vehicle speeds when motor
vehicles will be in close proximity to pedestrians; and
(E) With a prohibition on the carrying of open alcoholic liquor
containers and the consumption of alcoholic liquor on any open street or
highway except when necessary to cross the same at a designated
crosswalk.
(ii) Commons area may include any area of a public or private right-
of-way if the area otherwise meets the requirements of this section; and
(b) Local governing body means the governing body of the city or
village in which the entertainment district licensee is located.
Sec. 12. Section 53-124, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-124 (1) At the time application is made to the commission for a
license of any type, the applicant shall pay the fee provided in section
-14-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
53-124.01 and, if the applicant is an individual, provide the applicant's
social security number. The commission shall issue the types of licenses
described in this section.
(2) There shall be an airline license, a boat license, a special
party bus license, a pedal-pub vehicle license, and a railroad license.
(3)(a) There shall be a manufacturer's license for alcohol and
spirits, for beer, and for wine. The annual fee for a manufacturer's
license for beer shall be based on the barrel daily capacity as follows:
(i) 1 to 100 barrel daily capacity, or any part thereof, tier one;
(ii) 100 to 150 barrel daily capacity, tier two;
(iii) 150 to 200 barrel daily capacity, tier three;
(iv) 200 to 300 barrel daily capacity, tier four;
(v) 300 to 400 barrel daily capacity, tier five;
(vi) 400 to 500 barrel daily capacity, tier six;
(vii) 500 barrel daily capacity, or more, tier seven.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, daily capacity means the
average daily barrel production for the previous twelve months of
manufacturing operation. If no such basis for comparison exists, the
manufacturing licensee shall pay in advance for the first year's
operation a fee of five hundred dollars.
(4) There shall be five classes of nonbeverage users' licenses:
Class 1, Class 2, Class 3, Class 4, and Class 5.
(5) In lieu of a manufacturer's, a retailer's, or a wholesaler's
license, there shall be a license to operate issued for a craft brewery,
a regional craft brewery, a farm winery, or a microdistillery.
(6)(a) There shall be six classes of retail licenses:
(i) Class A: Beer only, for consumption on the premises;
(ii) Class B: Beer only, for consumption off the premises, sales in
the original packages only;
(iii) Class C: Alcoholic liquor, for consumption on the premises and
off the premises, sales in original packages only except as provided in
-15-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
subsection (4) of section 53-123.04. If a Class C license is held by a
nonprofit corporation, it shall be restricted to consumption on the
premises only. A Class C license may have a sampling designation
restricting consumption on the premises to sampling, but such designation
shall not affect sales for consumption off the premises under such
license;
(iv) Class D: Alcoholic liquor, including beer, for consumption off
the premises, sales in the original packages only, except as provided in
subdivision (6)(a)(vi) of this section and subsection (2) of section
53-123.04;
(v) Class I: Alcoholic liquor, for consumption on the premises
except as provided in subsection (5) of section 53-123.04; and
(vi) Class J: Alcoholic liquor, including beer, for consumption off
the premises, sales in the original packages only, for a retail licensee
whose annual gross revenue from the sale of alcohol does not exceed
twenty percent of the licensee's total annual gross revenue from all
retail sales.
(b) All applicable license fees shall be paid by the applicant or
licensee directly to the city or village treasurer in the case of
premises located inside the corporate limits of a city or village and
directly to the county treasurer in the case of premises located outside
the corporate limits of a city or village.
(7) There shall be five types of shipping licenses as described in
section 53-123.15: Manufacturers, wholesalers, vintage wines, manufacture
direct sales, and retail direct sales.
(8) There shall be two types of wholesale licenses: Alcoholic liquor
and beer only. The annual fee shall be paid for the first and each
additional wholesale place of business operated in this state by the same
licensee and wholesaling the same product.
(9) There shall be a bottle club license. All applicable license
fees shall be paid by the applicant or licensee directly to the city or
-16-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
village treasurer in the case of premises located inside the corporate
limits of a city or village and directly to the county treasurer in the
case of premises located outside the corporate limits of a city or
village.
(10) The license year, unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska
Liquor Control Act, shall commence on May 1 of each year and shall end on
the following April 30, except that the license year for a Class C
license shall commence on November 1 of each year and shall end on the
following October 31. During the license year, no license shall be issued
for a sum less than the amount of the annual license fee as fixed in
section 53-124.01, regardless of the time when the application for such
license has been made, except that (a) when there is a purchase of an
existing licensed business and a new license of the same class is issued
or (b) upon the issuance of a new license for a location which has not
been previously licensed, the license fee and occupation taxes shall be
prorated on a quarterly basis as of the date of issuance.
Sec. 13. Section 53-124.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-124.01 (1) The fees for annual licenses finally issued by the
commission shall be as provided in this section and section 53-124.
(2) Airline license ... $100
(3) Boat license ... $50
(4) Bottle club license ... $300
(5) Special party bus license ... $75
(6) Manufacturer's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Alcohol and spirits 1,000
Beer - tier one 100
Beer - tier two 200
Beer - tier three 350
Beer - tier four 500
-17-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
Beer - tier five 650
Beer - tier six 700
Beer - tier seven 800
Wine 250
(7) Nonbeverage user's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Class 1 5
Class 2 25
Class 3 50
Class 4 100
Class 5 250
(8) Operator's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Craft brewery 250
Regional craft brewery 250
Farm winery 250
Microdistillery 250
(9) Pedal-pub vehicle license ... $50
(10) Railroad license ... $100
(11) Retail license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Class A 100
Class B 100
Class C 300
Class D 200
Class I 250
Class J 50
(12) Shipping license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Manufacturer 1,000
-18-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
Wholesaler 1,000
Vintage wines 1,000
Manufacture direct sales 500
Retail direct sales 500
(13) Wholesale license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Alcoholic liquor 750
Beer 500
Sec. 14. Section 53-124.11, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-124.11 (1) The commission may issue a special designated license
for sale or consumption of alcoholic liquor at a designated location to a
retail licensee, a craft brewery licensee, a regional craft brewery
licensee, a microdistillery licensee, a farm winery licensee, the holder
of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section
53-123.01, a municipal corporation, a fine arts museum incorporated as a
nonprofit corporation, a religious nonprofit corporation which has been
exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, a political
organization which has been exempted from the payment of federal income
taxes, or any other nonprofit corporation the purpose of which is
fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from
the payment of federal income taxes, under conditions specified in this
section. The applicant shall demonstrate meeting the requirements of this
subsection.
(2)(a) No retail licensee, craft brewery licensee, regional craft
brewery licensee, microdistillery licensee, farm winery licensee, holder
of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section
53-123.01, organization, or corporation enumerated in subsection (1) of
this section may be issued a special designated license under this
section for more than six calendar days in any one calendar year, except
that a nonprofit corporation, the purpose of which is fraternal,
-19-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from the
payment of federal income taxes, may be issued a special designated
license for up to twelve calendar days in any one calendar year. Only one
special designated license shall be required for any application for two
or more consecutive days.
(b) A municipal corporation, a fine arts museum incorporated as a
nonprofit corporation, a religious nonprofit corporation which has been
exempted from the payment of federal income taxes, a political
organization which has been exempted from the payment of federal income
taxes, or any other nonprofit corporation, the purpose of which is
fraternal, charitable, or public service and which has been exempted from
the payment of federal income taxes, may apply for special designated
licenses for the same location in a single application. The application
shall include all dates and times for which a special designated license
is being requested at such location.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to any holder of a catering
license.
(3) Except for any special designated license issued to a holder of
a catering license or to an organization or corporation as provided in
subdivision (2)(b) of this section, there shall be a fee of forty dollars
for each day identified in the special designated license. For a special
designated license issued to an organization or corporation as provided
in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, there shall be a fee of forty
dollars for the initial special designated license and ten dollars for
each additional day beyond the first at the same location in such
application. Such fee shall be submitted with the application for the
special designated license, collected by the commission, and remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. The applicant shall
be exempt from the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act
requiring an application or renewal fee and the provisions of the act
requiring the expiration of forty-five days from the time the application
-20-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
is received by the commission prior to the issuance of a license, if
granted by the commission. The retail licensees, craft brewery licensees,
regional craft brewery licensees, microdistillery licensees, farm winery
licensees, holders of manufacturer's licenses issued pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 53-123.01, municipal corporations,
organizations, and nonprofit corporations enumerated in subsection (1) of
this section seeking a special designated license shall file an
application on such forms as the commission may prescribe. Such forms
shall contain, along with other information as required by the
commission, (a) the name of the applicant, (b) the premises for which a
special designated license is requested, identified by street and number
if practicable and, if not, by some other appropriate description which
definitely locates the premises, (c) the name of the owner or lessee of
the premises for which the special designated license is requested, (d)
sufficient evidence that the holder of the special designated license, if
issued, will carry on the activities and business authorized by the
license for himself, herself, or itself and not as the agent of any other
person, group, organization, or corporation, for profit or not for
profit, (e) a statement of the type of activity to be carried on during
the time period for which a special designated license is requested, and
(f) sufficient evidence that the activity will be supervised by persons
or managers who are agents of and directly responsible to the holder of
the special designated license.
(4) No special designated license provided for by this section shall
be issued by the commission without the approval of the local governing
body. The local governing body may establish criteria for approving or
denying a special designated license. The local governing body may
designate an agent to determine whether a special designated license is
to be approved or denied. Such agent shall follow criteria established by
the local governing body in making his or her determination. The
determination of the agent shall be considered the determination of the
-21-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
local governing body unless otherwise provided by the local governing
body. For purposes of this section, the local governing body shall be the
city or village within which the premises for which the special
designated license is requested are located or, if such premises are not
within the corporate limits of a city or village, then the local
governing body shall be the county within which the premises for which
the special designated license is requested are located.
(5) If the applicant meets the requirements of this section, a
special designated license shall be granted and issued by the commission
for use by the holder of the special designated license. All statutory
provisions and rules and regulations of the commission that apply to a
retail licensee shall apply to the holder of a special designated license
with the exception of such statutory provisions and rules and regulations
of the commission so designated by the commission and stated upon the
issued special designated license, except that the commission may not
designate exemption of sections 53-180 to 53-180.07. The decision of the
commission shall be final. If the applicant does not qualify for a
special designated license, the application shall be denied by the
commission.
(6) A special designated license issued by the commission shall be
mailed or delivered electronically to the city, village, or county clerk
who shall deliver such license to the licensee upon receipt of any fee or
tax imposed by such city, village, or county.
Sec. 15. Section 53-124.12, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-124.12 (1) The holder of a license to sell alcoholic liquor at
retail issued under subsection (6) of section 53-124, a craft brewery
license, a regional craft brewery license, a microdistillery license, a
farm winery license, or a manufacturer's license issued under subsection
(2) of section 53-123.01 may obtain an annual catering license as
prescribed in this section. The catering license shall be issued for the
-22-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
same period and may be renewed in the same manner as the retail license,
craft brewery license, regional craft brewery license, microdistillery
license, farm winery license, or manufacturer's license.
(2) Any person desiring to obtain a catering license shall file with
the commission:
(a) An application upon such forms as the commission prescribes; and
(b) A license fee of one hundred dollars payable to the commission,
which fee shall be returned to the applicant if the application is
denied.
(3) When an application for a catering license is filed, the
commission shall notify the clerk of the city or incorporated village in
which such applicant is located or, if the applicant is not located
within a city or incorporated village, the county clerk of the county in
which such applicant is located, of the receipt of the application. The
commission shall include with such notice one copy of the application by
mail or electronic delivery. The local governing body and the commission
shall process the application in the same manner as provided in section
53-132.
(4) The local governing body with respect to catering licensees
within its liquor license jurisdiction as provided in subsection (5) of
this section may cancel a catering license for cause for the remainder of
the period for which such catering license is issued. Any person whose
catering license is canceled may appeal to the district court of the
county in which the local governing body is located.
(5) For purposes of this section, local governing body means (a) the
governing body of the city or village in which the catering licensee is
located or (b) if such licensee is not located within a city or village,
the governing body of the county in which such licensee is located.
(6) The local governing body may impose an occupation tax on the
business of a catering licensee doing business within the liquor license
jurisdiction of the local governing body as provided in subsection (5) of
-23-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
this section. Such tax may not exceed double the license fee to be paid
under this section.
Sec. 16. Section 53-124.16, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-124.16 (1) The commission may issue a promotional farmers market
special designated license to a craft brewery, regional craft brewery,
microdistillery, or farm winery licensee to sell or dispense alcoholic
liquor, which the holder is licensed to produce, at a farmers market
outside of the manufacturer's designated premises under conditions
specified in this section.
(2) A promotional farmers market special designated license issued
under this section shall not be used without approval of the local
governing body pursuant to section 53-124.17.
(3) The craft brewery, regional craft brewery, microdistillery, or
farm winery licensee seeking a promotional farmers market special
designated license under this section shall file an application on such
forms as the commission may prescribe. Such forms shall contain, along
with other information as required by the commission, (a) the name of the
applicant, (b) the premises for which the applicant is licensed,
identified by street and number if practicable and, if not, by some other
appropriate description which definitely locates the premises, (c)
sufficient evidence that the licensee will carry on the activities and
business authorized by the license on behalf of the licensee, and not as
the agent of any other person, group, organization, or corporation, for
profit or not for profit, (d) a statement of the type of activity to be
carried on during the time period for which a promotional farmers market
special designated license is requested, (e) sufficient evidence that the
activity will be supervised by persons or managers who are agents of and
directly responsible to the holder of the promotional farmers market
special designated license, and (f) information on a safety and security
plan for use of the promotional farmers market special designated license
-24-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
as required by the commission.
(4) There shall be a fee of fifteen dollars for a promotional
farmers market special designated license payable to the commission and
submitted with the application. The applicant shall be exempt from the
provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act requiring an application or
renewal fee and the provisions of the act requiring the expiration of
forty-five days from the time the application is received by the
commission prior to the issuance of a license, if granted by the
commission. The promotional farmers market special designated license
shall be issued for the same period and may be renewed in the same manner
as the craft brewery, regional craft brewery, microdistillery, or farm
winery license.
(5) If the applicant meets the requirements of this section, a
promotional farmers market special designated license shall be granted
and issued by the commission for use by the holder of the promotional
farmers market special designated license. All statutory provisions and
rules and regulations of the commission that apply to a retail license
shall apply to the holder of a promotional farmers market special
designated license with the exception of such statutory provisions and
rules and regulations of the commission so designated by the commission
and stated upon the issued promotional farmers market special designated
license, except that the commission may not designate exemption from
sections 53-180 to 53-180.07. The decision of the commission shall be
final. If the applicant does not qualify for a promotional farmers market
special designated license, the application shall be denied by the
commission.
(6) A promotional farmers market special designated license issued
by the commission shall be mailed or delivered to the licensee. The
licensee shall comply with any rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated by the commission. Violation of any provision of this section
or section 53-124.17 may be cause to revoke, cancel, or suspend the
-25-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
promotional farmers market special designated license or the class of
retail license issued under section 53-124 held by such licensee.
Sec. 17. Section 53-129, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-129 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this
section, retail, bottle club, craft brewery, regional craft brewery, and
microdistillery licenses issued under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act
apply only to that part of the premises described in the application
approved by the commission and in the license issued on the application.
For retail and bottle club licenses, only one location shall be described
in each license. For craft brewery and microdistillery licenses, up to
eight separate physical locations may be described in each license.
(2) After such license has been granted for the particular premises,
the commission, with the approval of the local governing body and upon
proper showing, may endorse upon the license permission to add to, delete
from, or abandon the premises described in such license and, if
applicable, to move from the premises to other premises approved by the
local governing body. In order to obtain such approval, the retail,
bottle club, craft brewery, regional craft brewery, or microdistillery
licensee shall file with the local governing body a request in writing
and a statement under oath which shows that the premises, as added to or
deleted from or to which such move is to be made, comply in all respects
with the requirements of the act. No such addition, deletion, or move
shall be made by any such licensee until the license has been endorsed to
that effect in writing by the local governing body and by the commission
and the licensee furnishes proof of payment of the renewal fee prescribed
in subsection (4) of section 53-131.
(3)(a) A retail, bottle club, craft brewery, regional craft brewery,
or microdistillery licensee may apply to the local governing body for a
temporary expansion of its licensed premises to an immediately adjacent
area owned or leased by the licensee or to an immediately adjacent
-26-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
street, parking lot, or alley, not to exceed fifty days for calendar year
2020 and, for each calendar year thereafter, not to exceed fifteen days
per calendar year. The temporary area shall otherwise comply with all
requirements of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.
(b) The licensee shall file an application with the local governing
body which shall contain (i) the name of the applicant, (ii) the premises
for which a temporary expansion is requested, identified by street and
number if practicable and, if not, by some other appropriate description
which definitely locates the premises, (iii) the name of the owner or
lessee of the premises for which the temporary expansion is requested,
(iv) sufficient evidence that the licensee will carry on the activities
and business authorized by the license for himself, herself, or itself
and not as the agent of any other person, group, organization, or
corporation, for profit or not for profit, (v) a statement of the type of
activity to be carried on during the time period for which a temporary
expansion is requested, and (vi) sufficient evidence that the temporary
expansion will be supervised by persons or managers who are agents of and
directly responsible to the licensee.
(c) No temporary expansion provided for by this subsection shall be
granted without the approval of the local governing body. The local
governing body may establish criteria for approving or denying a
temporary expansion. The local governing body may designate an agent to
determine whether a temporary expansion is to be approved or denied. Such
agent shall follow criteria established by the local governing body in
making the determination. The determination of the agent shall be
considered the determination of the local governing body unless otherwise
provided by the local governing body.
(d) For purposes of this section, the local governing body shall be
that of the city or village within which the premises for which the
temporary expansion is requested are located or, if such premises are not
within the corporate limits of a city or village, then the local
-27-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
governing body shall be that of the county within which the premises for
which the temporary expansion is requested are located.
(e) The decision of the local governing body shall be final. If the
applicant does not qualify for a temporary expansion, the temporary
expansion shall be denied by the local governing body.
(f) The city, village, or county clerk shall deliver confirmation of
the temporary expansion to the licensee upon receipt of any fee or tax
imposed by such city, village, or county.
Sec. 18. Section 53-131, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-131 (1) Any person desiring to obtain a new license to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail, a bottle club license, a craft brewery
license, a regional craft brewery license, or a microdistillery license
shall file with the commission:
(a) An application upon forms prescribed by the commission,
including the information required by subsection (3) of this section for
an application to operate a cigar shop;
(b) The license fee if under sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 such fee
is payable to the commission, which fee shall be returned to the
applicant if the application is denied; and
(c) The nonrefundable application fee in the sum of four hundred
dollars, except that the nonrefundable application fee for an application
for a cigar shop shall be one thousand dollars.
(2) The commission shall notify the clerk of the city or village in
which such license is sought or, if the license sought is not sought
within a city or village, the county clerk of the county in which such
license is sought, of the receipt of the application and shall include
one copy of the application with the notice. No such license shall be
issued or denied by the commission until the expiration of the time
allowed for the receipt of a recommendation of denial or an objection
requiring a hearing under subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of section 53-133.
-28-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
During the period of forty-five days after the date of receipt by mail or
electronic delivery of such application from the commission, the local
governing body of such city, village, or county may make and submit to
the commission recommendations relative to the granting or refusal to
grant such license to the applicant.
(3) For an application to operate a cigar shop, the application
shall include proof of the cigar shop's annual gross revenue as requested
by the commission and such other information as requested by the
commission to establish the intent to operate as a cigar shop. The
commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to regulate
cigar shops. The rules and regulations existing on August 1, 2014,
applicable to cigar bars shall apply to cigar shops until amended or
repealed by the commission.
(4) For renewal of a license under this section, a licensee shall
file with the commission an application, the license fee as provided in
subdivision (1)(b) of this section, and a renewal fee of forty-five
dollars.
Sec. 19. Section 53-132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-132 (1) If no hearing is required pursuant to subdivision (1)(a)
or (b) of section 53-133 and the commission has no objections pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of such section, the commission may waive the forty-
five-day objection period and, if not otherwise prohibited by law, cause
a retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery license, regional
craft brewery license, or microdistillery license to be signed by its
chairperson, attested by its executive director over the seal of the
commission, and issued in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this
section as a matter of course.
(2) A retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery license,
regional craft brewery license, or microdistillery license may be issued
to any qualified applicant if the commission finds that (a) the applicant
-29-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
is fit, willing, and able to properly provide the service proposed within
the city, village, or county where the premises described in the
application are located, (b) the applicant can conform to all provisions
and requirements of and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the
Nebraska Liquor Control Act, (c) the applicant has demonstrated that the
type of management and control to be exercised over the premises
described in the application will be sufficient to insure that the
licensed business can conform to all provisions and requirements of and
rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the act, and (d) the issuance
of the license is or will be required by the present or future public
convenience and necessity.
(3) In making its determination pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section the commission shall consider:
(a) The recommendation of the local governing body;
(b) The existence of a citizens' protest made in accordance with
section 53-133;
(c) The existing population of the city, village, or county and its
projected growth;
(d) The nature of the neighborhood or community of the location of
the proposed licensed premises;
(e) The existence or absence of other retail licenses, bottle club
licenses, craft brewery licenses, regional craft brewery licenses, or
microdistillery licenses with similar privileges within the neighborhood
or community of the location of the proposed licensed premises and
whether, as evidenced by substantive, corroborative documentation, the
issuance of such license would result in or add to an undue concentration
of licenses with similar privileges and, as a result, require the use of
additional law enforcement resources;
(f) The existing motor vehicle and pedestrian traffic flow in the
vicinity of the proposed licensed premises;
(g) The adequacy of existing law enforcement;
-30-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
(h) Zoning restrictions;
(i) The sanitation or sanitary conditions on or about the proposed
licensed premises; and
(j) Whether the type of business or activity proposed to be operated
in conjunction with the proposed license is and will be consistent with
the public interest.
(4) Retail licenses, bottle club licenses, craft brewery licenses,
regional craft brewery licenses, or microdistillery licenses issued or
renewed by the commission shall be mailed or delivered electronically to:
(a) The clerk of the city, village, or county who shall deliver the
same to the licensee upon receipt from the licensee of proof of payment
of (i) the license fee if by the terms of subsection (6) of section
53-124 the fee is payable to the treasurer of such city, village, or
county, (ii) any fee for publication of notice of hearing before the
local governing body upon the application for the license, (iii) the fee
for publication of notice of renewal as provided in section 53-135.01,
and (iv) occupation taxes, if any, imposed by such city, village, or
county except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section; or
(b) The licensee, upon confirmation from the clerk of the city,
village, or county that the necessary fees and taxes described in
subdivision (4)(a) of this section have been received by the clerk of
such city, village, or county.
(5) Notwithstanding any ordinance or charter power to the contrary,
no city, village, or county shall impose an occupation tax on the
business of any person, firm, or corporation licensed under the act and
doing business within the corporate limits of such city or village or
within the boundaries of such county in any sum which exceeds two times
the amount of the license fee required to be paid under the act to obtain
such license.
(6) Each license shall designate the name of the licensee, the place
of business licensed, and the type of license issued.
-31-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
(7) Class J retail licensees shall not be subject to occupation
taxes under subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 20. Section 53-133, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-133 (1) The commission shall set for hearing before it any
application for a retail license, bottle club license, craft brewery
license, regional craft brewery license, or microdistillery license
relative to which it has received:
(a) Within forty-five days after the date of receipt of such
application by the city, village, or county clerk, a recommendation of
denial from the city, village, or county;
(b) Within ten days after the receipt of a recommendation from the
city, village, or county, or, if no recommendation is received, within
forty-five days after the date of receipt of such application by the
city, village, or county clerk, objections in writing by not less than
three persons residing within such city, village, or county, protesting
the issuance of the license. Withdrawal of the protest does not prohibit
the commission from conducting a hearing based upon the protest as
originally filed and making an independent finding as to whether the
license should or should not be issued;
(c) Within forty-five days after the date of receipt of such
application by the city, village, or county clerk, objections by the
commission or any duly appointed employee of the commission, protesting
the issuance of the license; or
(d) An indication on the application that the location of a proposed
retail or bottle club establishment is within one hundred fifty feet of a
church as described in subsection (2) of section 53-177 and a written
request by the church for a hearing.
(2) Hearings upon such applications shall be in the following
manner: Notice indicating the time and place of such hearing shall be
mailed or electronically delivered to the applicant, the local governing
-32-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
body, each individual protesting a license pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)
of this section, and any church affected as described in subdivision (1)
(d) of this section, at least fifteen days prior to such hearing. The
notice shall state that the commission will receive evidence for the
purpose of determining whether to approve or deny the application.
Mailing or electronic delivery to the attorney of record of a party shall
be deemed to fulfill the purposes of this section. The commission may
receive evidence, including testimony and documentary evidence, and may
hear and question witnesses concerning the application. The commission
shall not use electronic delivery with respect to an applicant, a
protestor, or a church under this section without the consent of the
recipient to electronic delivery.
Sec. 21. Section 53-134, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
53-134 The local governing body of any city or village with respect
to licenses within its corporate limits and the local governing body of
any county with respect to licenses not within the corporate limits of
any city or village but within the county shall have the following
powers, functions, and duties with respect to retail, bottle club, craft
brewery, regional craft brewery, microdistillery, and entertainment
district licenses:
(1) To cancel or revoke for cause retail, craft brewery, regional
craft brewery, microdistillery, or entertainment district licenses to
sell or dispense alcoholic liquor or bottle club licenses, issued to
persons for premises within its jurisdiction, subject to the right of
appeal to the commission;
(2) To enter or to authorize any law enforcement officer to enter at
any time upon any premises licensed under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act
to determine whether any provision of the act, any rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation adopted by the local governing body has
-33-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
been or is being violated and at such time examine the premises of such
licensee in connection with such determination. Any law enforcement
officer who determines that any provision of the act, any rule or
regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation adopted by the local governing body has
been or is being violated shall report such violation in writing to the
executive director of the commission (a) within thirty days after
determining that such violation has occurred, (b) within thirty days
after the conclusion of an ongoing police investigation, or (c) within
thirty days after the verdict in a prosecution related to such an ongoing
police investigation if the prosecuting attorney determines that
reporting such violation prior to the verdict would jeopardize such
prosecution, whichever is later;
(3) To receive a signed complaint from any citizen within its
jurisdiction that any provision of the act, any rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation relating to alcoholic liquor has been or
is being violated and to act upon such complaints in the manner provided
in the act;
(4) To receive retail license fees, bottle club license fees, craft
brewery license fees, regional craft brewery license fees, and
microdistillery license fees as provided in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01
and entertainment district license fees as provided in section 53-123.17
and pay the same, after the license has been delivered to the applicant,
to the city, village, or county treasurer;
(5) To examine or cause to be examined any applicant or any retail
licensee, bottle club licensee, craft brewery licensee, regional craft
brewery licensee, microdistillery licensee, or entertainment district
licensee upon whom notice of cancellation or revocation has been served
as provided in the act, to examine or cause to be examined the books and
records of any applicant or licensee except as otherwise provided for
-34-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
bottle club licensees in section 53-123.08, and to hear testimony and to
take proof for its information in the performance of its duties. For
purposes of obtaining any of the information desired, the local governing
body may authorize its agent or attorney to act on its behalf;
(6) To cancel or revoke on its own motion any license if, upon the
same notice and hearing as provided in section 53-134.04, it determines
that the licensee has violated any of the provisions of the act or any
valid and subsisting ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation duly
enacted, adopted, and promulgated relating to alcoholic liquor. Such
order of cancellation or revocation may be appealed to the commission
within thirty days after the date of the order by filing a notice of
appeal with the commission. The commission shall handle the appeal in the
manner provided for hearing on an application in section 53-133;
(7) Upon receipt from the commission of the notice and copy of
application as provided in section 53-131, to fix a time and place for a
hearing at which the local governing body shall receive evidence, either
orally or by affidavit from the applicant and any other person, bearing
upon the propriety of the issuance of a license. Notice of the time and
place of such hearing shall be published in a legal newspaper in or of
statewide circulation or general circulation in such city, village, or
county one time not less than seven and not more than fourteen days
before the time of the hearing. Such notice shall include, but not be
limited to, a statement that all persons desiring to give evidence before
the local governing body in support of or in protest against the issuance
of such license may do so at the time of the hearing. Such hearing shall
be held not more than forty-five days after the date of receipt of the
notice from the commission, and after such hearing the local governing
body shall cause to be recorded in the minute record of their proceedings
a resolution recommending either issuance or refusal of such license. The
clerk of such city, village, or county shall mail to the commission by
first-class mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the resolution which shall
-35-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
state the cost of the published notice, except that failure to comply
with this provision shall not void any license issued by the commission.
If the commission refuses to issue such a license, the cost of
publication of notice shall be paid by the commission from the security
for costs;
(8) To review and authorize an application by a retail, bottle club,
craft brewery, regional craft brewery, farm winery, or microdistillery
licensee for a temporary expansion of its licensed premises within the
jurisdiction of the local governing body to an immediately adjacent area
owned or leased by the licensee or to an immediately adjacent street,
parking lot, or alley, not to exceed fifty days for calendar year 2020
and, for each calendar year thereafter, not to exceed fifteen days per
calendar year, as provided in sections 53-123.12 and 53-129; and
(9) To review and authorize an application by a craft brewery,
regional craft brewery, farm winery, or microdistillery licensee that
holds a promotional farmers market special designated license for a
permit to use such promotional farmers market special designated license
to sell or dispense alcoholic liquor, which the holder is licensed to
produce, at a farmers market within the jurisdiction of the local
governing body as provided in section 53-124.17. The local governing body
shall electronically notify the commission within five days after
authorization of any permit pursuant to this subdivision.
Sec. 22. Section 53-134.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-134.03 The governing bodies of cities and villages are authorized
to regulate by ordinance, not inconsistent with the Nebraska Liquor
Control Act, the business of all retail, bottle club, craft brewery,
regional craft brewery, or microdistillery licensees carried on within
the corporate limits of the city or village.
Sec. 23. Section 53-164.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-36-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
53-164.01 Payment of the tax provided for in section 53-160 on
alcoholic liquor shall be paid by the manufacturer or wholesaler as
follows:
(1)(a) All manufacturers or wholesalers, except farm winery
producers, whether inside or outside this state shall, on or before the
twenty-fifth day of each calendar month following the month in which
shipments were made, submit a report to the commission upon forms
furnished by the commission showing the total amount of alcoholic liquor
in gallons or fractional parts thereof shipped by such manufacturer or
wholesaler, whether inside or outside this state, during the preceding
calendar month;
(b) All beer wholesalers shall, on or before the twenty-fifth day of
each calendar month following the month in which shipments were made,
submit a report to the commission upon forms furnished by the commission
showing the total amount of beer in gallons or fractional parts thereof
shipped by all manufacturers, whether inside or outside this state,
during the preceding calendar month to such wholesaler;
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision,
farm winery producers which paid less than one thousand dollars of excise
taxes pursuant to section 53-160 for the previous calendar year and which
will pay less than one thousand dollars of excise taxes pursuant to
section 53-160 for the current calendar year shall, on or before the
twenty-fifth day of the calendar month following the end of the year in
which wine was packaged and released from bond, submit a report to the
commission upon forms furnished by the commission showing the total
amount of wine in gallons or fractional parts thereof packaged and
released from bond by such producer during the preceding calendar year;
and
(ii) Farm winery producers which paid one thousand dollars or more
of excise taxes pursuant to section 53-160 for the previous calendar year
or which become liable for one thousand dollars or more of excise taxes
-37-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
pursuant to section 53-160 during the current calendar year shall, on or
before the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month following the month in
which wine was packaged and released from bond, submit a report to the
commission upon forms furnished by the commission showing the total
amount of wine in gallons or fractional parts thereof packaged and
released from bond by such producer during the preceding calendar month.
A farm winery producer which becomes liable for one thousand dollars or
more of excise taxes pursuant to section 53-160 during the current
calendar year shall also pay such excise taxes immediately;
(d) A craft brewery or regional craft brewery shall, on or before
the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month following the month in which
the beer was released from bond for sale, submit a report to the
commission on forms furnished by the commission showing the total amount
of beer in gallons or fractional parts thereof produced for sale by the
craft brewery or regional craft brewery during the preceding calendar
month;
(e) A microdistillery shall, on or before the twenty-fifth day of
each calendar month following the month in which the distilled liquor was
released from bond for sale, submit a report to the commission on forms
furnished by the commission showing the total amount of distilled liquor
in gallons or fractional parts thereof produced for sale by the
microdistillery during the preceding calendar month; and
(f) Reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of
this subdivision shall also contain a statement of the total amount of
alcoholic liquor, except beer, in gallons or fractional parts thereof
shipped to licensed retailers inside this state and such other
information as the commission may require;
(2) The wholesaler or farm winery producer shall at the time of the
filing of the report pay to the commission the tax due on alcoholic
liquor, except beer, shipped to licensed retailers inside this state at
the rate fixed in accordance with section 53-160. The tax due on beer
-38-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
shall be paid by the wholesaler on beer shipped from all manufacturers;
(3) The tax imposed pursuant to section 53-160 shall be due on the
date the report is due less a discount of one percent of the tax on
alcoholic liquor for submitting the report and paying the tax in a timely
manner. The discount shall be deducted from the payment of the tax before
remittance to the commission and shall be shown in the report to the
commission as required in this section. If the tax is not paid within the
time provided in this section, the discount shall not be allowed and
shall not be deducted from the tax;
(4) If the report is not submitted by the twenty-fifth day of the
calendar month or if the tax is not paid to the commission by the twenty-
fifth day of the calendar month, the following penalties shall be
assessed on the amount of the tax: One to five days late, three percent;
six to ten days late, six percent; and over ten days late, ten percent.
In addition, interest on the tax shall be collected at the rate of one
percent per month, or fraction of a month, from the date the tax became
due until paid;
(5) No tax shall be levied or collected on alcoholic liquor
manufactured inside this state and shipped or transported outside this
state for sale and consumption outside this state;
(6) In order to insure the payment of all state taxes on alcoholic
liquor, together with interest and penalties, persons required to submit
reports and payment of the tax shall, at the time of application for a
license under sections 53-124 and 53-124.01, enter into a surety bond
with corporate surety, both the bond form and surety to be approved by
the commission. Subject to the limitations specified in this subdivision,
the amount of the bond required of any taxpayer shall be fixed by the
commission and may be increased or decreased by the commission at any
time. In fixing the amount of the bond, the commission shall require a
bond equal to the amount of the taxpayer's estimated maximum monthly
excise tax ascertained in a manner as determined by the commission.
-39-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
Nothing in this section shall prevent or prohibit the commission from
accepting and approving bonds which run for a term longer than the
license period. The amount of a bond required of any one taxpayer shall
not be less than one thousand dollars. The bonds required by this section
shall be filed with the commission; and
(7) When a manufacturer or wholesaler sells and delivers alcoholic
liquor upon which the tax has been paid to any instrumentality of the
armed forces of the United States engaged in resale activities as
provided in section 53-160.01, the manufacturer or wholesaler shall be
entitled to a credit in the amount of the tax paid in the event no tax is
due on such alcoholic liquor as provided in such section. The amount of
the credit, if any, shall be deducted from the tax due on the following
monthly report and subsequent reports until liquidated.
Sec. 24. Section 53-169, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-169 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no
manufacturer or wholesaler shall directly or indirectly: (a) Pay for any
license to sell alcoholic liquor at retail or advance, furnish, lend, or
give money for payment of such license; (b) purchase or become the owner
of any note, mortgage, or other evidence of indebtedness of such licensee
or any form of security therefor; (c) be interested in the ownership,
conduct, or operation of the business of any licensee authorized to sell
alcoholic liquor at retail; or (d) be interested directly or indirectly
or as owner, part owner, lessee, or lessor thereof in any premises upon
which alcoholic liquor is sold at retail.
(2) This section does not apply to the holder of a farm winery
license. The holder of a craft brewery license shall have the privileges
and duties listed in section 53-123.14, the holder of a regional craft
brewery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 4
of this act, and the holder of a manufacturer's license shall have the
privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.01 with respect to the
-40-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of beer, and except as
provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.14, the Nebraska Liquor
Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a craft
brewery license, of a regional craft brewery license, or of a
manufacturer's license issued pursuant to section 53-123.01 to engage in
the wholesale distribution of beer. The holder of a microdistillery
license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.16
with respect to the manufacture of alcoholic liquor, and except as
provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.16, the Nebraska Liquor
Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a
microdistillery license to engage in the wholesale distribution of
alcoholic liquor.
(3) It shall not be a violation of this section for a wholesaler or
manufacturer or the agent of a wholesaler or manufacturer to enter into a
sponsorship or advertising agreement with a licensee, organization, or
political subdivision of the State of Nebraska pursuant to section
53-165.03.
Sec. 25. Section 53-171, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
53-171 (1) No person licensed as a wholesaler of alcoholic liquor
shall be permitted to receive any retail license at the same time. No
person licensed as a manufacturer shall be permitted to receive any
retail license at the same time except as set forth in subsection (2) of
section 53-123.01 with respect to the manufacture, distribution, and
retail sale of beer, and the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be
construed to permit the holder of a manufacturer's license issued
pursuant to such subsection to engage in the wholesale distribution of
alcoholic liquor. No person licensed as a retailer of alcoholic liquor
shall be permitted to receive any manufacturer's or wholesale license at
the same time.
(2) This section shall not apply to the holder of a farm winery
-41-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
license. The holder of a craft brewery license shall have the privileges
and duties listed in section 53-123.14 with respect to the manufacture,
distribution, and retail sale of beer, and except as provided in
subsection (2) of section 53-123.14, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act
shall not be construed to permit the holder of a craft brewery license to
engage in the wholesale distribution of beer. The holder of a regional
craft brewery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in
section 4 of this act. The holder of a microdistillery license shall have
the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.16 with respect to the
manufacture of alcoholic liquor, and except as provided in subsection (2)
of section 53-123.16, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be
construed to permit the holder of a microdistillery license to engage in
the wholesale distribution of alcoholic liquor.
Sec. 26. Section 53-1,115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-1,115 (1) A copy of the rule, regulation, order, or decision of
the commission denying an application or suspending, canceling, or
revoking a license or of any notice required by any proceeding before it,
certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served upon each
party of record to the proceeding before the commission. Service upon any
attorney of record for any such party shall be deemed to be service upon
such party. Each party appearing before the commission shall enter his or
her appearance and indicate to the commission his or her address for such
service. The mailing of a copy of any rule, regulation, order, or
decision of the commission or of any notice by the commission, in the
proceeding, to such party at such address shall be deemed to be service
upon such party.
(2) Within thirty days after the service of any rule, regulation,
order, or decision of the commission denying an application or
suspending, canceling, or revoking any license upon any party to the
proceeding, as provided for by subsection (1) of this section, such party
-42-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
may apply for a rehearing with respect to any matters determined by the
commission. The commission shall receive and consider such application
for a rehearing within thirty days after its filing with the executive
director of the commission. If such application for rehearing is granted,
the commission shall proceed as promptly as possible to consider the
matters presented by such application. No appeal shall be allowed from
any decision of the commission except as provided in section 53-1,116.
(3) Upon final disposition of any proceeding, costs shall be paid by
the party or parties against whom a final decision is rendered. Costs may
be taxed or retaxed to local governing bodies as well as individuals.
Only one rehearing referred to in subsection (2) of this section shall be
granted by the commission on application of any one party.
(4) For purposes of this section, party of record means:
(a) In the case of an administrative proceeding before the
commission on the application for a retail, bottle club, craft brewery,
regional craft brewery, or microdistillery license:
(i) The applicant;
(ii) Each individual protesting the issuance of such license
pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 53-133;
(iii) The local governing body if it is entering an appearance to
protest the issuance of the license or if it is requesting a hearing
pursuant to subdivision (1)(c) of section 53-133; and
(iv) The commission;
(b) In the case of an administrative proceeding before a local
governing body to cancel or revoke a retail, bottle club, craft brewery,
regional craft brewery, or microdistillery license:
(i) The licensee; and
(ii) The local governing body; and
(c) In the case of an administrative proceeding before the
commission to suspend, cancel, or revoke a retail, bottle club, craft
brewery, regional craft brewery, or microdistillery license:
-43-

LB1151 LB1151
2026 2026
(i) The licensee; and
(ii) The commission.
Sec. 27. Original sections 53-116.02, 53-117.07, 53-123, 53-124.16,
53-131, 53-133, 53-134.03, 53-164.01, and 53-1,115, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 53-103, 53-103.51, 53-124.11, 53-124.12,
53-132, 53-169, and 53-171, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
and sections 53-101, 53-123.01, 53-123.15, 53-123.17, 53-124, 53-124.01,
53-129, and 53-134, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-44-